North Carolina, session 2025, SB1020.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 7 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new Part to read:
"Part 37. Affordable Housing Efficiency Grant Program.
"§ 143B-344.65. Definitions.
The following definitions apply to this Part:
(1) Affordable multifamily housing. – Multifamily residential buildings of five or
more dwelling units where at least fifty percent (50%) of the units are reserved
for or occupied by households with incomes at or below eighty percent (80%)
of the area median income, adjusted for household size, or as otherwise
defined by the Department.
(2) Area median income. – The annual median household income of an area as
determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(3) Department. – The Department of Environmental Quality.
(4) Electric building upgrades. – Improvements that replace fossil fuel systems
with high-efficiency electric alternatives, including, but not limited to, heat
pumps, electric water heaters, induction stoves, and electric vehicle charging
infrastructure.
(5) Energy efficiency upgrades. – Measures that reduce energy consumption,
including, insulation, efficient windows, lighting, appliances, and heating,
ventilation, or air conditioning systems.
(6) Office. – The State Energy Office.
"§ 143B-344.66. Establishment of program.
(a) The Affordable Housing Efficiency Grant Program is established within the Office of
the Department to provide flexible incentive grants to affordable multifamily housing for energy
efficiency upgrades and electric building upgrades. The program shall prioritize projects that
reduce energy costs for low-income residents, improve building performance, enhance indoor
environmental quality, and support clean energy goals. The Department shall adopt rules to
implement this Part, including criteria for grant applications, eligibility, prioritization, allowable
uses of funds, incentive structures, and reporting requirements.
(b) Grants may be used for any of the following:
*S1020-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Energy efficiency upgrades.
(2) Electric building upgrades.
(3) Related health and safety improvements necessary to facilitate the upgrades,
including ventilation enhancements or structural repairs.
(4) Project planning, design, and implementation costs, including energy audits
and technical assistance.
(c) The Office shall perform all duties required to facilitate the program, including
developing application processes, awarding grants, and monitoring compliance and outcomes.
The Office may partner with local government units, utilities, or nonprofits to accomplish the
objectives of the program.
(d) Eligibility. – Grants shall only be awarded to affordable multifamily housing
buildings that meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Have been in service for at least 15 years as affordable multifamily housing
buildings.
(2) Are located in potentially underserved communities, as identified by criteria
to be established by the Department.
(e) Incentive Amounts. – Grants shall provide incentives for early adoption that shall not
exceed seventy-five cents ($0.75) per square foot of eligible space. Incentive amounts will be
based on project scope, demonstrated energy savings, and compliance with program tiers or
performance standards established by the Department.
(f) Compliance. – Grant recipients must ensure upgrades comply with applicable
building codes and energy standards. Applicants must also comply with federal requirements if
they are using federal funds in addition to State funds. Recipients shall maintain affordability
commitments for a period specified by the Department.
"§ 143B-344.67. Reporting and evaluation.
(a) Grant recipients shall report annually to the Office on project outcomes, including
energy savings, cost reductions for residents, greenhouse gas emissions reductions, and health or
environmental benefits.
(b) The Office shall submit an annual report to the Joint Legislative Commission on
Energy Policy on program performance, funds allocated, projects completed, and
recommendations for improvements."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in recurring funds beginning
in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for staffing and operating funds for the Affordable
Housing Efficiency Grant Program, as enacted by this act. Up to six percent (6%) of the funds
may be used by the Department for administrative costs.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1020-First Edition